Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1201
Act, how cited.

Sections 85-1201 to 85-1210 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Collegiate Athletic Association Procedures Act.

Laws 1990, LB 397, § 1.